Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1712.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7312(h) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 7312. Organization.This agency shall consist of and be organized substantially as follows:* * * (h) Emergency communications.--(1) The agency shall maintain an integrated communications capability designed to provide to all areas and counties weather advisories, river forecasts, warnings, and direction and control of all emergency preparedness functions within the Commonwealth. The agency shall 1234567891011121314151617 coordinate the Commonwealth's emergency communication systems, sharing of information and weather emergency notification among the National Weather Service, contiguous State emergency management offices, local coordinators of emergency management, the Pennsylvania State Police, local police departments, private relief associations, offices of the legislative branch and other appropriate organizations. [Additionally, the](2) The agency shall establish the sole Statewide telephone number that persons, including county and municipal emergency management personnel, may use to report incidences of radioactive and hazardous materials and other disaster emergencies.(3) The agency shall also establish the sole Statewide telephone number that offices of the legislative branch may use to directly communicate with the agency during weather emergencies.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1712PN2109 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819